dev/wikt.full-form.pl.dix
    <pardef n="ułam/ek__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l>ek</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ek</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ka</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kowi</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kiem</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ków</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kom</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kach</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kami</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kropl/a__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ę</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>i/kropel</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jesiotr__n_ma">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ze</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ze</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ów</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bor__n_mi">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>owi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ze</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lal/ka__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kę</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ce</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ce</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ką</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ko</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ek</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kom</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kach</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kami</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ki</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kur/a__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ę</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ze</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ze</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ą</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>om</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ach</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ami</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="biegunka"><i>biegun</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bor"><i>bor</i><par n="bor__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="bułka"><i>buł</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="chmura"><i>chmur</i><par n="kur/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="czaszka"><i>czasz</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="czcionka"><i>czcion</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dwójka"><i>dwój</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fajka"><i>faj</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fotka"><i>fot</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="jednostka"><i>jednost</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="jesiotr"><i>jesiotr</i><par n="jesiotr__n_ma"/></e>
    <e lm="komórka"><i>komór</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kostka"><i>kost</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kredka"><i>kred</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kropla"><i>kropl</i><par n="kropl/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kultura"><i>kultur</i><par n="kur/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kura"><i>kur</i><par n="kur/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lalka"><i>lal</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="latarka"><i>latar</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="litera"><i>liter</i><par n="kur/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mandarynka"><i>mandaryn</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="maska"><i>mas</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="miska"><i>mis</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="notatka"><i>notat</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ołówek"><i>ołów</i><par n="ułam/ek__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="partnerka"><i>partner</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pierwiastek"><i>pierwiast</i><par n="ułam/ek__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="polka"><i>pol</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="prostytutka"><i>prostytut</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="puszka"><i>pusz</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rogówka"><i>rogów</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="rybka"><i>ryb</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="siekiera"><i>siekier</i><par n="kur/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="stożek"><i>stoż</i><par n="ułam/ek__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="szklanka"><i>szklan</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sójka"><i>sój</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="truskawka"><i>truskaw</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="trzustka"><i>trzust</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="trąbka"><i>trąb</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tundra"><i>tundr</i><par n="kur/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tęczówka"><i>tęczów</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ułamek"><i>ułam</i><par n="ułam/ek__n_mi"/></e>
    <e lm="wiewiórka"><i>wiewiór</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="wizytówka"><i>wizytów</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="wódka"><i>wód</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zapałka"><i>zapał</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="łopatka"><i>łopat</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ścieżka"><i>ścież</i><par n="lal/ka__n_f"/></e>
